Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2161.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1513. Tree removal agreements.(a) Agreements.--On or after the effective date of this sub section, if a public utility determines that the removal of a tree is necessary for the public utility to provide adequate and reliable service to the public and that the tree is the property of a city, municipality or municipal authority, the public utility shall offer to enter into an agreement with the city, municipality or municipal authority that owns the tree requiring the public utility to plant a tree in replacement of the tree removed. As a condition of the agreement, the public utility shall plant the replacement tree within two years of the removal 123456789101112131415161718 of a tree by the public utility. A city, municipality or municipal authority shall not be obligated to accept the public utility's offered agreement upon the removal of a tree.(b) Replacement tree size.--If a city, municipality or municipal authority accepts the public utility's offered agreement, the public utility shall replace any tree over a five-inch caliper utilizing the caliper inch replacement method as follows:(1) Each tree marked for removal is measured at the standardized height and assigned a diameter at breast height value.(2) The assigned diameter at breast height value is then halved.(3) The halved value shall be the number of two-inch replacement balled and burlapped trees necessary to replant.(4) Appropriate replacement species and planting locations shall be determined by the city, municipality or municipal authority.(c) Replacement fee.--A city, municipality or municipal authority may request a replacement fee, equal to the assessed value of the tree by a certified arborist, from the public utility for the purpose of planting a tree, in lieu of planting a tree.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2161PN2804 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324